South Dakota, session 2026, HB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
Except as provided in section 2 of this Act, a person must accept cash, at least at
one point-of-sale, as a form of payment for any goods or services sold at retail to a
purchaser provided:
(1) The sale and payment for the goods or services occurs in person;
(2) The person selling the goods or services, or an individual employed by the person
selling the goods or services, is physically present at the time of the sale;
(3) The purchaser of the goods or services chooses to pay the purchase price using
cash; and
(4) The consideration total payment received by the person selling the goods or
services in the transaction is one hundred dollars or less.
A person selling goods or services may not charge a consumer a higher price for
the use of cash as a form of payment.
For purposes of this section, "cash" means physical coin, currency, or notes that
are designated as legal tender by federal law.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
The provisions of section 1 of this Act do not apply to:
(1) Federally chartered credit unions;
(2) Financial institutions, as defined in § 10-43-1;
(3) The sale of goods or services that require a credit card for purposes of placing a
security deposit or covering unforeseen damages or expenses; or
(4) The sale of, or payment for, goods or services occurring on an airplane; or
(5) A transaction for a rental agreement of a rental car, as defined by § 58-30-197.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1061A 2 1061
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
The state and, its political subdivisions, and any private person or business acting
as an agent of the state or a political subdivision, must accept cash as a form of payment
for any fee or charge imposed on any member of the public if:
(1) The payment is submitted to the correct office in person;
(2) The member of the public chooses to submit payment in the form of cash; and
(3) The total payment received by the state or political subdivision is one hundred
dollars or less.
The state and its political subdivisions may not impose a higher fee or charge upon
any member of the public for the use of cash as a form of payment.
For purposes of this section, "cash" means physical coin, currency, or notes that
are designed as legal tender by federal law.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.